Illinois, session 104th, HB629.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Bill of Rights for the Homeless Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (775 ILCS 45/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Bill 8of Rights for the Homeless Act. 9(Source: P.A. 98-516, eff. 8-22-13.)